test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-celties_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - celties: # Verb 'eng bring/fin tuoda' - _STUMT_ full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/celties/
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Inf: celties
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1: celšos
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2: celsies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1: celsimies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2: [celsieties, celsities]
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3: celsies

     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1: ceļos
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2: ceļies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1: ceļamies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2: ceļaties
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3: ceļas

     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: cēlos
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: cēlies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: cēlāmies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: cēlāties
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: cēlās

     celties+V+TV+Refl+Deb+Prs: jāceļas
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Quo+Prs: ceļoties
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Quo+Fut: celšot
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Imprt+Sg2: celies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+Imprt+Pl2: celieties

#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļošs
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļoša
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļošam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļošu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļošā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļoši
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļošu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļošiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļošus
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļošos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļošais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļošā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļošajam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļošo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļošajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [ceļošais, ceļošo]
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļošie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļošo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļošajiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļošos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļošajos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļošie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļoša
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļošas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļošai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļošu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļošā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļošas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļošu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļošām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļošas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļošās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļošā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļošās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļošajai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļošo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļošajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: ceļošā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļošās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļošo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļošajām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļošās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļošajās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļošās

     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēlies
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: cēluša
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: cēlušam
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: cēlušā
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēlušies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: cēlušiem
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: cēlušais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: cēlušā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: cēlušajam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: cēlušo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: cēlušajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: cēlušais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: cēlušie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: cēlušo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: cēlušajiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: cēlušajos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: cēlušie
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: cēlusies
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: cēlušās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: cēlušai
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: cēlušā
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: cēlušās
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: cēlušām
     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: cēlušos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: cēlušās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: cēlusī
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: cēlušās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: cēlušajai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: cēlušo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: cēlušajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: cēlusī
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: cēlušās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: cēlušo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: cēlušajām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: cēlušās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: cēlušajās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: cēlušās

#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļams
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļama
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļamam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļamu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļamā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļami
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļamu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļamiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļamus
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļamos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļamais
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļamā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļamajam
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļamo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļamajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [ceļamais, ceļamo]
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļamie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļamo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļamajiem
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļamos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļamajos
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļamie
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ceļama
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceļamas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ceļamai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceļamu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceļamā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceļamas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceļamu
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: ceļamām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceļamas
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceļamās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: ceļamā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: ceļamās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ceļamajai
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ceļamo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: ceļamajā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: ceļamā
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: ceļamās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: ceļamo
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: ceļamajām
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: ceļamās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: ceļamajās
#     celties+V+TV+Refl+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: ceļamās
